DI-270

DIAGNOSTICS - ACTIVEHEIGHT CONTROLSUSPENSION &
SKYHOOK TEMS

DI3GT-03

DTC C 1782 /82 Stop Light Switch Circuit

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

When the brake pedal is depressed, the stop light switch comes on and battery voltage is applied to terminal
STP of ECU. This signalis used by the ECU as one of the starting conditions for anti

—dive control.
DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area
* Stop light switch
C1782/82 Stop light switch signal does notchange. « Stop light switch circuit
» Suspension control ECU
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Check operation of stop light.

CHECK:
Check that the stop light comes on when the brake pedal is depressed and turns off when the brake pedal
is released.

@

2 | Check output signal of stop light switch.

NG> Check stop light circuit (See page BE-58).

INCASEOFUSINGHAND -HELDTESTER:

PREPARATION:

(a) Connectthehand -heldtestertothe DLCS.

(b) Turntheignition switch ON and pushthe hand -heldtester main switch ON.

(c) Selectthe DATALIST mode onthe hand -heldtester.

CHECK:

Checkthe stop light switch condition displayed onthe hand -heldtesterwhen depressing andreleasingthe
brake pedal.

OK:

When the brake pedal is depressed: "ON” is displayed for stop light switch condition.
When the brake pedal is released: "OFF” is displayed for stop light switch condition.

ON INCASEOFNOTUSINGHAND -HELDTESTER:
@ STP PREPARATION:
SRR Y Remove the suspension control ECU with connectors still con-

§ j nected.
CHECK:

O /N ) (@  Turn the ignition switch ON.
\\_// (b) Measure voltage between terminal STP of suspension
l control ECU connector and body ground when brake ped-
= Fo5741 alisreleased and depressed.
OK:
Brake pedal Voltage
Depressed 9-14V
Released Below 1.5V

OK> No problem.
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3 | Check for open circuit in harness and connector between stop light switch and
suspension control ECU (See page IN-35).

NG> Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK
~_—

Check and replace suspension control ECU.
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